Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ANALYSIS OF ECONOMIC IMPACT FROM INCREASED IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT IN MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development to conduct a comprehensive analysis of the statewide economic impact of increased immigration enforcement beginning in 2025, including operations associated with Operation Metro Surge launched in December 2025, on Minnesota's workforce, small businesses, and statewide economy. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The analysis must include but is not limited to evaluation of: new text end new text begin (1) impacts on labor force participation, workforce availability, and workforce shortages across sectors of Minnesota's economy; new text end new text begin (2) impacts on small businesses and microbusinesses, including family-owned, immigrant-owned, and locally owned businesses, with consideration of workforce availability, hiring challenges, operational costs, business continuity, and long-term business sustainability; new text end new text begin (3) sector-specific impacts on industries including agriculture, food processing, construction, health care, hospitality, manufacturing, transportation, and retail; new text end new text begin (4) impacts on business operations, supply chains, productivity, and business closures or relocations; new text end new text begin (5) regional economic impacts across Minnesota, including comparisons across counties and between rural, suburban, and urban communities and regional labor markets, to the extent practicable; and new text end new text begin (6) impacts on consumer spending, state and local tax revenue, and overall economic output. new text end new text begin (c) The analysis may incorporate relevant data and information from academic institutions, Minnesota businesses, state agencies, and other available economic data sources. The commissioner may solicit proposals and contract with a nonpartisan third party to prepare the report. new text end new text begin (d) By February 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit the analysis in a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce and economic development. new text end